Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.250

Compensation boards—Quorum—Transmittal of minutes, claims—Appeal to department.

A majority of the compensation board shall constitute a quorum, and no business shall be transacted when a majority is not present, and no claim shall be allowed when a majority of the board has not voted favorably thereon.

The board shall send a copy of the minutes of all meetings to the department with copies of all material pertaining to each claim submitted and noting the action of the board on each claim. Appeals may be made by the emergency worker from any action by the board within one year by writing to the department.

[ 1986 c 266 s 34; 1984 c 38 s 26; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 28; 1953 c 223 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.